Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2205.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 8109(a) and 8110(a) of Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 8109. Acquisition of property rights by commission.[(a) Condemnation.--The commission may condemn, pursuant to 26 Pa.C.S. (relating to eminent domain), any lands, interests in lands, property rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements and other property deemed necessary or convenient for the construction and efficient operation of the turnpikes and the toll road conversions or necessary in the restoration or relocation of public or private property damaged or destroyed.]* * *§ 8110. Procedural requirements of acquisition.1234567891011121314151617181920 [(a) Title.--Title to any property condemned by the commission shall be taken in the name of the commission.]* * *Section 2. Section 8111 of Title 74 is repealed:[§ 8111. Entry and possession of property condemned.Whenever the commission has condemned any lands, rights, rights-of-way, easements and franchises, or interests therein, as provided in this chapter, the commission may proceed to obtain possession in the manner provided by 26 Pa.C.S. (relating to eminent domain).]Section 3. Section 8122 of Title 74 is amended to read:§ 8122. [Reserved.] Condemnation by commission prohibited.The commission may not condemn, for the purposes of acquisition and possession in accordance with 26 Pa.C.S. (relating to eminent domain) or otherwise , any lands, interests in lands, property rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements or other property.Section 4. This act shall not apply to:(1) A proceeding commenced under 26 Pa.C.S. before the effective date of this paragraph.(2) An action taken by the commission before the effective date of this paragraph.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2205PN2898 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223